src/verb-nob-morph.txt
! ========================
! Sublexica for verb roots
! ========================

! Main types, from Bokmålsordboka
! v1  kaste       kaster      kasta       kasta
!                             kastet      kastet
! v2  lyse        lyser       lyste       lyst
!     reparere    reparerer   reparerte   reparert
! v3  leve        lever       levde       levd
! v4  nå          når         nådde       nådd
! v4  bie         bier        bidde       bidd

! Subtypes
! v13 v1 or v3
! v1-s passive v1 verbs
! v2-s passive v2 verbs
! v3-s passive v3 verbs

! =========================== !
! Sublexica for regular verbs !
! =========================== !


LEXICON vx 
! +X: v1 ; ! ditto
     v1 ;

LEXICON v13 ! sveve -> svevet, svevde.
 v1 ;
 v3 ;

LEXICON v1 ! kaste
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres ;
 +V: a-et-pret ;

 
LEXICON v2 ! blåse, studere
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres ;
 +V: te-pret ;

LEXICON v3 ! leve
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: regpres ;
 +V: de-pret ;

LEXICON v4 ! ro, bie
 +V: inf-prsptc ;
 +V: r-pres ;
 +V: dde-pret ;

LEXICON v1-s ! undres
 +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;
 +Ind+Prt: # ;
 +PrfPtc: # ;

LEXICON v2-s ! føles, synes
 +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;
 +Ind+Prt:Q1 # ;
 +PrfPtc:Q1 # ;

LEXICON v3-s ! trives
 +Inf: # ;
 +Ind+Prs: # ;
 +Ind+Prt:Q2 # ;
 +PrfPtc:Q2 # ;





! ---------------------
! Conjugation sublexica
! ---------------------

LEXICON inf-prsptc
 +Inf: # ;
 +Imp:%>Q3 # ;
 +PrsPtc:%>ende # ;
 +ING:%>ing # ;

LEXICON regpres
 +Ind+Prs:%>er # ;
 +Ind+Prs+Pass:%>es # ;

LEXICON r-pres
 +Ind+Prs:%>r # ;
 +Ind+Prs+Pass:%>s # ;

LEXICON a-et-pret
 +Ind+Prt+Radical:%>a # ;
 +Ind+Prt:%>et # ;
 +PrfPtc+Radical:%>a # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>et # ;

LEXICON te-pret
 +Ind+Prt:%>Q3te # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>Q3t # ;

LEXICON de-pret
 +Ind+Prt:%>Q3de # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>Q3d # ;

LEXICON dde-pret
 +Ind+Prt:%>dde # ;
 +PrfPtc:%>dd # ;






! ============================= !
! Sublexica for irregular verbs !
! ============================= !


LEXICON BE 
be+V+Inf:be # ;
be+V+Imp:be # ;
be+V+Ind+Prs:ber # ;
be+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bes # ;
be+V+Ind+Prt:ba # ;
be+V+PrfPtc:bedt # ;
be+V+PrsPtc:beende # ;

LEXICON BINDE
binde+V+Inf:binde # ;
binde+V+Imp:bind # ;
binde+V+Ind+Prs:binder # ;
binde+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bindes # ;
binde+V+Ind+Prt:bandt # ;
binde+V+PrfPtc:bundet # ;
binde+V+PrsPtc:bindende # ;

LEXICON BITE
bite+V+Inf:bite # ;
bite+V+Imp:bit # ;
bite+V+Ind+Prs:biter # ;
bite+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bites # ;
bite+V+Ind+Prt:bet # ;
bite+V+PrfPtc:bitt # ;
bite+V+PrsPtc:bitende # ;

LEXICON BLI
bli+V+Inf:bli # ;
bli+V+Imp:bli # ;
bli+V+Ind+Prs:blir # ;
bli+V+Ind+Prt:ble # ;
bli+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:blei # ;
bli+V+PrfPtc:blitt # ;
bli+V+PrsPtc:blivende # ;

LEXICON BLIVE
blive+V+Inf:blive  # ;
blive+V+Imp:bliv  # ;
blive+V+Ind+Prs:bliver  # ;
blive+V+Ind+Prt:blev  # ;
blive+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:bleiv  # ;
blive+V+PrfPtc:blevet  # ;
blive+V+PrsPtc:blivende  # ;

LEXICON BREKKE
brekke+V+Inf:brekke # ;
brekke+V+Imp:brekk # ;
brekke+V+Ind+Prs:brekker # ;
brekke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:brekkes # ;
brekke+V+Ind+Prt:brakk # ;
brekke+V+PrfPtc:brukket # ;
brekke+V+PrsPtc:brekkende # ;

LEXICON BRENNE
brenne+V+Inf:brenne # ;
brenne+V+Imp:brenn # ;
brenne+V+Ind+Prs:brenner # ;
brenne+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:brennes # ;
brenne+V+Ind+Prt:brant # ;
brenne+V+Ind+Prt:brente # ;
brenne+V+PrfPtc:brent # ;
brenne+V+PrfPtc:brunnet # ;
brenne+V+PrsPtc:brennende # ;

LEXICON BRESTE
breste+V+Inf:breste # ;
breste+V+Imp:brest # ;
breste+V+Ind+Prs:brester # ;
breste+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:brestes # ;
breste+V+Ind+Prt:brast # ;
breste+V+PrfPtc:brustet # ;
breste+V+PrsPtc:brestende # ;

LEXICON BRINGE
bringe+V+Inf:bringe # ;
bringe+V+Imp:bring # ;
bringe+V+Ind+Prs:bringer # ;
bringe+V+Ind+Prt:brakte # ;
bringe+V+PrfPtc:brakt # ;
bringe+V+PrsPtc:bringende # ;

LEXICON BRISTE
briste+V+Inf:briste # ;
briste+V+Imp:brist # ;
briste+V+Ind+Prs:brister # ;
briste+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bristes # ;
briste+V+Ind+Prt:brast # ;
briste+V+PrfPtc:brustet # ;
briste+V+PrsPtc:bristende # ;

LEXICON BRYTE
bryte+V+Inf:bryte # ;
bryte+V+Imp:bryt # ;
bryte+V+Ind+Prs:bryter # ;
bryte+V+Ind+Prt:brøt # ;
bryte+V+Ind+Prt:braøt # ;
bryte+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:brøyt # ; !SUB 
bryte+V+PrfPtc:brytt # ;
bryte+V+PrsPtc:brytende # ;

LEXICON BURDE 
burde+V+Inf:burde # ;
burde+V+Ind+Prs:bør # ;
burde+V+Ind+Prt:burde # ;

LEXICON BY 
by+V+Inf:by # ;
by+V+Imp:by # ;
by+V+Ind+Prs:byr # ;
by+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bys # ;
by+V+Ind+Prt:bød # ;
by+V+PrfPtc:bydd # ;
by+V+PrsPtc:byende # ;

LEXICON BYDE 
byde+V+Inf:byde # ;
byde+V+Imp:byd # ;
byde+V+Ind+Prs:byder # ;
byde+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bydes # ;
byde+V+Ind+Prt:bød # ;
byde+V+PrfPtc:bydd # ;
byde+V+PrsPtc:bydende # ;

LEXICON BÆRE 
bære+V+Inf:bære # ;
bære+V+Imp:bær # ;
bære+V+Ind+Prs:bærer # ;
bære+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:bæres # ;
bære+V+Ind+Prt:bar # ;
bære+V+PrfPtc:båret # ;
bære+V+PrsPtc:bærende # ;

LEXICON DETTE 
dette+V+Inf:dette # ;
dette+V+Imp:dett # ;
dette+V+Ind+Prs:detter # ;
dette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:dettes # ;
dette+V+Ind+Prt:datt # ;
dette+V+PrfPtc:dettet # ;
dette+V+PrsPtc:dettende # ;

LEXICON DRA
dra+V+Inf:dra # ;
dra+V+Imp:dra # ;
dra+V+Ind+Prs:drar # ;
dra+V+Ind+Prt:dro # ;
dra+V+Ind+Prt:drog # ;
dra+V+PrfPtc:dratt # ;
dra+V+PrsPtc:draende # ;

LEXICON XIKKE 
ikke+V+Inf:ikke # ;
ikke+V+Imp:ikk # ;
ikke+V+Ind+Prs:ikker # ;
ikke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ikkes # ;
ikke+V+Ind+Prt:akk # ;
ikke+V+PrfPtc:ukket # ;
ikke+V+PrsPtc:ikkende # ;

LEXICON DRIVE 
drive+V+Inf:drive # ;
drive+V+Imp:driv # ;
drive+V+Ind+Prs:driver # ;
drive+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:drives # ;
drive+V+Ind+Prt:drev # ;
drive+V+PrfPtc:drevet # ;
drive+V+PrsPtc:drivende # ;

LEXICON DØLGE 
dølge+V+Inf:dølge # ;
dølge+V+Imp:dølg # ;
dølge+V+Ind+Prs:dølger # ;
dølge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:dølges # ;
dølge+V+Ind+Prt:dulgte # ;
dølge+V+PrfPtc:dulgt # ;
dølge+V+PrsPtc:dølgende # ;

LEXICON DØ
dø+V+Inf:dø # ;
dø+V+Imp:dø # ;
dø+V+Ind+Prs:dør # ;
dø+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:døes # ;
dø+V+Ind+Prt:døde # ;
dø+V+PrfPtc:dødd # ;
dø+V+Prdtc:døende # ;

LEXICON EIE 
eie+V+Inf:eie # ;
eie+V+Imp:ei # ;
eie+V+Ind+Prs:eiwe # ;
eie+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:eies # ;
eie+V+Ind+Prt:eide # ;
eie+V+PrfPtc:eid # ;
eie+V+PrsPtc:eiende # ;

LEXICON ETE 
ete+V+Inf:ete # ;
ete+V+Imp:et # ;
ete+V+Ind+Prs:eter # ;
ete+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:etes # ;
ete+V+Ind+Prt:åt # ;
ete+V+PrfPtc:ett # ;
ete+V+PrsPtc:etende # ;

LEXICON FALLE 
falle+V+Inf:falle # ;
falle+V+Imp:fall # ;
falle+V+Ind+Prs:faller # ;
falle+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:falles # ;
falle+V+Ind+Prt:falt # ;
falle+V+PrfPtc:falt # ;
falle+V+PrsPtc:fallende # ;

LEXICON FARE 
fare+V+Inf:fare # ;
fare+V+Imp:far # ;
fare+V+Ind+Prs:farer # ;
fare+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fares # ;
fare+V+Ind+Prt:for # ;
fare+V+PrfPtc:fart # ;
fare+V+PrsPtc:farende # ;

LEXICON FINNE
finne+V+Inf:finne # ;
finne+V+Imp:finn # ;
finne+V+Ind+Prs:finner # ;
finne+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:finnes # ;
finne+V+Ind+Prt:fant # ;
finne+V+PrfPtc:funnet # ;
finne+V+PrsPtc:finnende # ;

LEXICON FISE 
fise+V+Inf:fise # ;
fise+V+Imp:fis # ;
fise+V+Ind+Prs:fiser # ;
fise+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fises # ;
fise+V+Ind+Prt:fes # ;
fise+V+Ind+Prt:feis # ;
fise+V+Ind+Prt:fiste # ;
fise+V+PrfPtc:fist # ;
fise+V+PrfPtc:feset # ;
fise+V+PrsPtc:fisende # ;

LEXICON FLY 
fly+V+Inf:fly # ;
fly+V+Imp:fly # ;
fly+V+Ind+Prs:flyr # ;
fly+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flys # ;
fly+V+Ind+Prt:fløy # ;
fly+V+PrfPtc:flydd # ;
fly+V+PrfPtc:fløyet # ;
fly+V+PrsPtc:flyende # ;
fly+V+PrsPtc:flyvende # ;

LEXICON FLYTE
flyte+V+Inf:flyte  # ;
flyte+V+Imp:flyt  # ;
flyte+V+Ind+Prs:flyter  # ;
flyte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:flytes  # ;
flyte+V+Ind+Prt:fløt  # ;
flyte+V+Ind+Prt:fløyt  # ;
flyte+V+Ind+Prt:flaut  # ;
flyte+V+PrfPtc:flytt  # ;
flyte+V+PrsPtc:flytende  # ;

LEXICON FORLATE ! stem prep + late
+V+Inf:late  # ;
+V+Imp:lat  # ;
+V+Ind+Prs:later  # ;
+V+Ind+Prt:lot  # ;
+V+PrfPtc:latt  # ;

LEXICON FRYSE 
fryse+V+Inf:fryse  # ;
fryse+V+Imp:frys  # ;
fryse+V+Ind+Prs:fryser  # ;
fryse+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fryses  # ;
fryse+V+Ind+Prt:frøs  # ;
fryse+V+Ind+Prt:frøys  # ;
fryse+V+Ind+Prt:fraus  # ;
fryse+V+PrfPtc:fryst  # ;
fryse+V+PrfPtc:frosset  # ;
fryse+V+PrsPtc:frysende  # ;

LEXICON FYKE 
fyke+V+Inf:fyke  # ;
fyke+V+Imp:fyk  # ;
fyke+V+Ind+Prs:fyker  # ;
fyke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fykes  # ;
fyke+V+Ind+Prt:føk  # ;
fyke+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:fauk  # ;
fyke+V+Ind+Prt:føyk  # ;
fyke+V+PrfPtc:føket  # ;
fyke+V+PrsPtc:fykende  # ;

LEXICON FÅ 
få+V+Inf:få  # ;
få+V+Imp:få  # ;
få+V+Ind+Prs:får  # ;
få+V+Ind+Prt:fikk  # ;
få+V+PrfPtc:fått  # ;
få+V+PrsPtc:fående  # ;

LEXICON FØLGE 
følge+V+Inf:følge  # ;
følge+V+Imp:følg  # ;
følge+V+Ind+Prs:følger  # ;
følge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:følges  # ;
følge+V+Ind+Prt:fulgte  # ;
følge+V+PrfPtc:fulgt  # ;
følge+V+PrsPtc:følgende  # ;

LEXICON GALE 
gale+V+Inf:gale  # ;
gale+V+Imp:gal  # ;
gale+V+Ind+Prs:galer  # ;
gale+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gales  # ;
gale+V+Ind+Prt:gol  # ;
gale+V+Ind+Prt:galte  # ;
gale+V+PrfPtc:galt  # ;
gale+V+PrsPtc:galende  # ;

LEXICON GIDDE 
gidde+V+Inf:gidde  # ;
gidde+V+Imp:gidd  # ;
gidde+V+Ind+Prs:gidd  # ;
gidde+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gidd  # ;
gidde+V+Ind+Prt:gidd  # ;
gidde+V+PrfPtc:gidd  # ;
gidde+V+PrsPtc:giddende  # ;

LEXICON GI
gi+V+Inf:gi  # ;
gi+V+Imp:gi  # ;
gi+V+Ind+Prs:gir  # ;
gi+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gis  # ;
gi+V+Ind+Prt:ga  # ;
gi+V+Ind+Prt:gav  # ;
gi+V+PrfPtc:gitt  # ;
gi+V+PrsPtc:giende  # ;
gi+V+PrsPtc:givende  # ;

LEXICON GJELDE 
gjelde+V+Inf:gjelde  # ;
gjelde+V+Imp:gjeld  # ;
gjelde+V+Ind+Prs:gjelder  # ;
gjelde+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gjeldes  # ;
gjelde+V+Ind+Prt:gjaldt  # ;
gjelde+V+PrfPtc:gjeldt  # ;
gjelde+V+PrsPtc:gjeldende  # ;

LEXICON GJØRE
gjøre+V+Inf:gjøre  # ;
gjøre+V+Imp:gjør  # ;
gjøre+V+Ind+Prs:gjør  # ;
gjøre+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gjøres  # ;
gjøre+V+Ind+Prt:gjorde  # ;
gjøre+V+PrfPtc:gjort  # ;
gjøre+V+PrsPtc:gjørende  # ;

LEXICON GLEPPE 
gleppe+V+Inf:gleppe  # ;
gleppe+V+Imp:glepp  # ;
gleppe+V+Ind+Prs:glepper  # ;
gleppe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gleppes  # ;
gleppe+V+Ind+Prt:glapp  # ;
gleppe+V+PrfPtc:gluppet  # ;
gleppe+V+PrsPtc:gleppende  # ;

LEXICON GLI 
gli+V+Inf:gli  # ;
gli+V+Imp:gli  # ;
gli+V+Ind+Prs:glir  # ;
gli+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:glis  # ;
gli+V+Ind+Prt:gled  # ;
gli+V+PrfPtc:glidd  # ;
gli+V+PrsPtc:glidende  # ;

LEXICON GLIPPE 
glippe+V+Inf:glippe  # ;
glippe+V+Imp:glipp  # ;
glippe+V+Ind+Prs:glipper  # ;
glippe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:glippes  # ;
glippe+V+Ind+Prt:glapp  # ;
glippe+V+PrfPtc:gluppet  # ;
glippe+V+PrsPtc:glippende  # ;

LEXICON GNAGE 
gnage+V+Inf:gnage  # ;
gnage+V+Imp:gnag  # ;
gnage+V+Ind+Prs:gnager  # ;
gnage+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gnages  # ;
gnage+V+Ind+Prt:gnog  # ;
gnage+V+Ind+Prt:gnagde  # ;
gnage+V+Ind+Prt:gnaget  # ;
gnage+V+Ind+Prt:gnaga  # ;
gnage+V+PrfPtc:gnagd  # ;
gnage+V+PrsPtc:gnagende  # ;

LEXICON GNI 
gni+V+Inf:gni  # ;
gni+V+Imp:gni  # ;
gni+V+Ind+Prs:gnir  # ;
gni+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gnies  # ;
gni+V+Ind+Prt:gned  # ;
gni+V+Ind+Prt:gnei  # ;
gni+V+PrfPtc:gnidd  # ;
gni+V+PrsPtc:gniende  # ;

LEXICON GRAVE 
grave+V+Inf:grave  # ;
grave+V+Imp:grav  # ;
grave+V+Ind+Prs:graver  # ;
grave+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:graves  # ;
grave+V+Ind+Prt:gravde  # ;
grave+V+Ind+Prt:grov  # ;
grave+V+PrfPtc:gravd  # ;
grave+V+PrfPtc:gravet  # ;
grave+V+PrsPtc:gravende  # ;

LEXICON GRINE 
grine+V+Inf:grine  # ;
grine+V+Imp:grin  # ;
grine+V+Ind+Prs:griner  # ;
grine+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:grines  # ;
grine+V+Ind+Prt:grein  # ;
grine+V+Ind+Prt:gren  # ;
grine+V+PrfPtc:grint  # ;
grine+V+PrsPtc:grinende  # ;

LEXICON GRIPE 
gripe+V+Inf:gripe  # ;
gripe+V+Imp:grip  # ;
gripe+V+Ind+Prs:griper  # ;
gripe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gripes  # ;
gripe+V+Ind+Prt:grep  # ;
gripe+V+Ind+Prt:greip  # ;
gripe+V+PrfPtc:grepet  # ;
gripe+V+PrsPtc:gripende  # ;

LEXICON GRÅTE 
gråte+V+Inf:gråte  # ;
gråte+V+Imp:gråt  # ;
gråte+V+Ind+Prs:gråter  # ;
gråte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gråtes  # ;
gråte+V+Ind+Prt:gråt  # ;
gråte+V+PrfPtc:grått  # ;
gråte+V+PrsPtc:gråtende  # ;

LEXICON GYSE 
gyse+V+Inf:gyse  # ;
gyse+V+Imp:gys  # ;
gyse+V+Ind+Prs:gyser  # ;
gyse+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gyses  # ;
gyse+V+Ind+Prt:gyste  # ;
gyse+V+Ind+Prt:gjøs  # ;
gyse+V+PrfPtc:gyst  # ;
gyse+V+PrsPtc:gysende  # ;

LEXICON GYTE 
gyte+V+Inf:gyte  # ;
gyte+V+Imp:gyt  # ;
gyte+V+Ind+Prs:gyter  # ;
gyte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gytes  # ;
gyte+V+Ind+Prt:gjøt  # ;
gyte+V+PrfPtc:gytt  # ;
gyte+V+PrsPtc:gytende  # ;
